Hawaii statutes.
[ARTICLE 3A]

PRIVACY OF CONSUMER FINANCIAL INFORMATION

Note

Personal information protection requirements. L Sp 2008, c
10, §§7 to 15.

Cross References

Information privacy and security council; personal
information security, see §§487N-5 to 487N-7.

Personal information policy and oversight responsibilities
for government agencies, see §487J-5.

PART I. GENERAL PROVISIONS

[§431:3A-101]
Purpose; scope; applicability. (a) This article governs the treatment of nonpublic personal financial information about individuals
by all insurance licensees. This article:

(1) Requires licensees to provide notice to
individuals about its privacy policies and practices;

(2) Establishes the conditions under which a licensee
may disclose nonpublic personal financial information about individuals to
affiliates and nonaffiliated third parties; and

(3) Provides methods for individuals to prevent a
licensee from disclosing that information.

(b) This article shall apply to nonpublic
personal financial information about individuals who obtain or are claimants or
beneficiaries of a licensee's products or services primarily for personal,
family, or household purposes. This article shall not apply to information
about companies or about individuals that obtain products or services for
business, commercial, or agricultural purposes.

(c) Notice
provisions under part II of this
article shall not apply to licensees in liquidation or receivership. [L 2001, c 220, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next